Nevada, session 83, SB244.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that federal financial participation is
available, the Director shall include under Medicaid coverage for:
(a) Treatment for obesity, including, without limitation,
coverage of:
(1) Intensive health, behavior and lifestyle treatment; and
(2) Any surgical intervention included in the most current
Guidelines on Indications for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery
published by the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric
Surgery and the International Federation for the Surgery of
Obesity and Metabolic Disorders; and
(b) The services of a diabetes prevention program for
recipients of Medicaid who:
(1) Meet the eligibility requirements for the diabetes
prevention program; and
(2) Have not previously participated in a diabetes
prevention program while enrolled in Medicaid.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive
federal funding to provide the coverage described in subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Diabetes prevention program” means a program that:
(1) Consists of structured sessions to create changes in
behavioral health for the purpose of preventing or delaying the
onset of type II diabetes;
(2) Is provided by an entity recognized by the Diabetes
Prevention Recognition Program, as defined in 42 C.F.R. §
410.79, and is delivered in a manner authorized by that program;
and
(3) Follows a CDC-approved DPP curriculum, as defined
in 42 C.F.R. § 410.79.
(b) “Intensive health, behavior and lifestyle treatment” means
an evidence-based, intensive, multi-component program to modify
the behavior and lifestyle of a participant that:
(1) Supports healthy weight management;
-
*SB244*

– 3 –
(2) Meets current standards recognized by the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services or current clinical standards of
care; and
(3) Is provided:
(I) In person in an office or community-based setting;
or
(II) Virtually or through telehealth, as defined in
NRS 629.515.
Sec. 2. NRS 422.4025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.4025 1. The Department shall:
(a) By regulation, develop a list of preferred prescription drugs
to be used for the Medicaid program and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, and each public or nonprofit health benefit plan
that elects to use the list of preferred prescription drugs as its
formulary pursuant to NRS 287.012, 287.0433 or 687B.407; and
(b) Negotiate and enter into agreements to purchase the drugs
included on the list of preferred prescription drugs on behalf of the
health benefit plans described in paragraph (a) or enter into a
contract pursuant to NRS 422.4053 with a pharmacy benefit
manager, health maintenance organization or one or more public or
private entities in this State, the District of Columbia or other states
or territories of the United States, as appropriate, to negotiate such
agreements.
2. The Department shall, by regulation, establish a list of
prescription drugs which must be excluded from any restrictions that
are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that are on the list of
preferred prescription drugs established pursuant to subsection 1.
The list established pursuant to this subsection must include,
without limitation:
(a) Prescription drugs that are prescribed for the treatment of the
human immunodeficiency virus, including, without limitation,
antiretroviral medications;
(b) Antirejection medications for organ transplants;
(c) Antihemophilic medications; and
(d) Any prescription drug which the Board identifies as
appropriate for exclusion from any restrictions that are imposed by
the Medicaid program on drugs that are on the list of preferred
prescription drugs.
3. The regulations must provide that the Board makes the final
determination of:
(a) Whether a class of therapeutic prescription drugs is included
on the list of preferred prescription drugs and is excluded from any
restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that
are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
-
*SB244*

– 4 –
(b) Which therapeutically equivalent prescription drugs will be
reviewed for inclusion on the list of preferred prescription drugs and
for exclusion from any restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid
program on drugs that are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
and
(c) Which prescription drugs should be excluded from any
restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that
are on the list of preferred prescription drugs based on continuity of
care concerning a specific diagnosis, condition, class of therapeutic
prescription drugs or medical specialty.
4. The list of preferred prescription drugs established pursuant
to subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) Any prescription drug determined by the Board to be
essential for treating sickle cell disease and its variants; [and]
(b) Prescription drugs to prevent the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus [.] ; and
(c) Prescription drugs approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration with an indication for chronic weight
management in patients who have been diagnosed with obesity.
5. The regulations must provide that each new pharmaceutical
product and each existing pharmaceutical product for which there is
new clinical evidence supporting its inclusion on the list of preferred
prescription drugs must be made available pursuant to the Medicaid
program with prior authorization until the Board reviews the product
or the evidence.
6. The Medicaid program must cover a prescription drug that is
not included on the list of preferred prescription drugs as if the drug
were included on that list if:
(a) The drug is:
(1) Used to treat hepatitis C;
(2) Used to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder;
(3) Used to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder; or
(4) In the same class as a drug on the list of preferred
prescription drugs; and
(b) All preferred prescription drugs within the same class as the
drug are unsuitable for a recipient of Medicaid because:
(1) The recipient is allergic to all preferred prescription drugs
within the same class as the drug;
(2) All preferred prescription drugs within the same class as
the drug are contraindicated for the recipient or are likely to interact
in a harmful manner with another drug that the recipient is taking;
(3) The recipient has a history of adverse reactions to all
preferred prescription drugs within the same class as the drug; or
-
*SB244*

– 5 –
(4) The drug has a unique indication that is supported by
peer-reviewed clinical evidence or approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
7. The Medicaid program must automatically cover any typical
or atypical antipsychotic medication or anticonvulsant medication
that is not on the list of preferred prescription drugs upon the
demonstrated therapeutic failure of one drug on that list to
adequately treat the condition of a recipient of Medicaid.
8. The Medicaid program must cover the drugs described in
paragraph (c) of subsection 4 to the extent that such drugs are
prescribed in accordance with the indications of the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
9. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning the agreements negotiated
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and contracts entered into
pursuant to NRS 422.4053 which must include, without limitation,
the financial effects of obtaining prescription drugs through those
agreements and contracts, in total and aggregated separately for
agreements negotiated by the Department, contracts with a
pharmacy benefit manager, contracts with a health maintenance
organization and contracts with public and private entities from this
State, the District of Columbia and other states and territories of the
United States; and
(b) Post the report on an Internet website maintained by the
Department and submit the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the Legislature; or
(2) In even-numbered years, the Legislative Commission.
Sec. 3. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
-
*SB244*

– 6 –
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
-
*SB244*

– 7 –
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 4. Not later than 30 days after beginning to provide the
coverage under Medicaid required by sections 1 and 2 of this act,
the Department of Health and Human Services shall provide written
or electronic notice to recipients of Medicaid of the availability of
such coverage.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB244*